Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201919-928
Planning commission; funds, equipment, and accommodations; limit upon expenditures.

The city council or village board of trustees may provide the funds, equipment, and accommodations necessary for the work of the planning commission of a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village, but the expenditures of the commission, exclusive of gifts, shall be within the amounts appropriated for that purpose by the city council or village board of trustees. No expenditures or agreements for expenditures shall be valid in excess of such amounts.

Laws 1937, c. 39, § 5, p. 177;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-2105;

R.S.1943, § 19-928;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 94.